vi: Thiết bị hiệu ứng đặc biệt tương thích: Máy phun sương; Máy chiếu Gobo; Đèn LED; Đèn laser; Thiết bị chiếu sáng; Đèn nhấp nháy; Khác
cs: Kompatibilní zařízení pro speciálními efekty: Výrobník mlhy; Gobo projektor; LED světla; Laserová světla; Svítidla; Stroboskopická světla; Jiné
fi: Yhteensopiva erikoistehostelaite: Savukone; Gobo-heitin; LED-valot; Laservalot; Valaisimet; Strobovalot; Muu
nl: Compatibel apparaat met speciale effecten: Rookmachine; Gobo-projector; Led-verlichting; Laserverlichting; Lichtarmaturen; Stroboscoopverlichting; Andere
ja: 使用可能な特殊効果機器: スモークマシン; ゴボプロジェクター; LEDライト; レーザーライト; 照明器具; ストロボライト; その他
en: Compatible special effects device: Fog machine; Gobo projector; LED lights; Laser lights; Lighting fixtures; Strobe lights; Other
fr: Appareil à effets spéciaux compatible: Machine fumigène; Projecteurs Gobo; Lumières LED; Lumières laser; Appareils d'éclairage; Lumières stroboscopiques; Autre
lt-LT: Suderinamas specialiųjų efektų įrenginys: Rūko mašina; GOBO projektorius; Šviesos diodų žibintai; Lazerinis žibintai; Šviestuvai; Stroboskopai; Kita
ko: 호환 가능한 특수 효과 장치: 연무기; 고보 프로젝터; LED 조명; 레이저 조명; 조명 기구; 스트로브 조명; 기타
ru: Совместимые устройства для создания спецэффектов: Дым-машина; Проектор гобо; Светодиодные фонари; Лазерные фонари; Светильники; Стробоскопы; Другое
de: Kompatibles Spezialeffektgerät: Nebelmaschine; Gobo-Projektor; LED-Lichter; Laserlichter; Leuchten; Stroboskoplichter; Sonstiges
tr: Uyumlu özel efekt cihazı: Duman makinesi; Gobo projektörü; LED ışıklar; Lazer ışıkları; Aydınlatma teçhizatı; Stroboskop ışıkları; Diğer
sl-SI: Združljiva naprava za posebne učinke: Stroj za meglo; Gobo projektor; LED luči; Laserske luči; Svetlobna telesa; Stroboskopske luči; Drugo
nb: Kompatibel spesialeffektenhet: Røykmaskin; Gobo-projektor; LED-lys; Laserlys; Lysarmaturer; Strobelys; Annet
zh-TW: 相容的特效裝置: 造霧機; Gobo 燈; LED 燈; 雷射燈; 燈具; 頻閃燈; 其他
hr-HR: Kompatibilni uređaj za specijalne efekte: Stroj za maglu; Gobo projektor; LED svjetla; Laserska svjetla; Rasvjetna tijela; Stroboskopska svjetla; Ostalo
ro-RO: Dispozitiv efecte speciale compatibil: Mașini de ceață; Proiector Gobo; Lumini LED; Lumini laser; Corpuri de iluminat; Lumini stroboscopice; Altele
pt-PT: Dispositivo de efeitos especiais compatível: Máquina de nevoeiro; Projetor de logótipos (Gobo); Luzes LED; Luzes laser; Luminárias; Luzes estroboscópicas; Outro
pt-BR: Dispositivo de efeitos especiais compatível: Máquina de fumaça; Projetor gobo; Luzes de LED; Luzes laser; Instalações de iluminação; Luzes estroboscópicas; Outro
pl: Kompatybilne urządzenie do efektów specjalnych: Urządzenie do wytwarzania mgły; Projektor Gobo; Światełka LED; Światła laserowe; Oprawy oświetleniowe; Światła stroboskopowe; Inne
bg-BG: Съвместимо устройство за специални ефекти: Машина за мъгла; Проектор Gobo; LED светлини; Лазерни светлини; Осветителни тела; Строб лампи; Други
it: Dispositivo per effetti speciali compatibile: Macchina della nebbia; Proiettore Gobo; Luci LED; Luci laser; Impianti di illuminazione; Luci stroboscopiche; Altro
es: Dispositivo de efectos especiales compatible: Máquina de humo; Proyector de gobos; Luces LED; Luces láser; Lámparas; Luces estroboscópicas; Otros
da: Kompatibel specialeffektenhed: Røgmaskine; Gobo-projektor; LED-lys; Laserlys; Belysningsarmaturer; Strobelys; Andet
sk-SK: Kompatibilné zariadenie so špeciálnymi efektmi: Stroj na hmlu; Gobo projektor; LED svetlá; Laserové svetlá; Osvetľovacie telesá; Stroboskopické svetlá; Iné
sv: Kompatibel enhet för specialeffekter: Dimmaskin; Gobo-projektor; LED-lampor; Laserljus; Belysningsarmaturer; Stroboskopljus; Övrigt
th: อุปกรณ์เอฟเฟกต์พิเศษที่เข้ากันได้: เครื่องทำหมอก; โปรเจคเตอร์โกโบ; ไฟ LED; แสงเลเซอร์; โคมไฟและอุปกรณ์แสงสว่าง; ไฟสโตรบ; อื่นๆ
hu: Kompatibilis különleges effektes készülék: Ködgép; Gobo projektor; LED lámpák; Lézerfények; Világítótestek; Villogó fények; Egyéb
el: Συμβατή συσκευή ειδικών εφέ: Μηχανή ομίχλης; Προβολέας Gobo; Φώτα LED; Φώτα λέιζερ; Φωτιστικά; Φωτορυθμικά; Άλλο
zh-CN: 兼容特效设备: 造雾机; 图案投影仪; LED 灯; 激光灯; 照明器材; 闪光灯; 其他